Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General

§ 1-21-101.
Docket to be kept; contents.

Every judge shall keep a docket in which he shall enter:

The title of all causes commenced before him;

The time when process was issued against the defendant, its particular nature and to what officer delivered;

The time when the parties appeared before him, either without or upon the return of process;

A brief statement of the nature of the plaintiff’s demand and the amount claimed, and if any setoff was pleaded, a similar statement of the setoff and the amount claimed;

Every adjournment stating at whose request and for what time;

The time when the trial was had, stating whether the trial was by the jury or by the justice;

The verdict of the jury, when rendered and the judgment thereon;

The judgment of the court;

The time of issuing execution and the name of the officer to whom delivered;

The fact of an appeal taken and allowed, and when taken and allowed;

Satisfaction of judgment and when made;

Any other entries material to the cause, showing the proceedings before the justice.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 3421; R.S. 1899, § 4330; C.S. 1910, § 5192; C.S. 1920, § 6468; R.S. 1931, § 62-301; C.S. 1945, § 14-201; W.S. 1957, § 1-508; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-22-101

; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “Justices of the Peace” from the chapter title; and in (a) substituted “judge” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Substantial compliance. —

An entry in docket of a justice of the peace, referring to the written petition of plaintiff on file in the cause, is sufficient compliance with the provisions of this section. Pointer v. Jones, 15 Wyo. 1, 85 P. 1050,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1906).

Cited

in

Cheeseman v. Fenton, 13 Wyo. 436, 80 P. 823,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1905).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity of notice of intention to correct error in judgment entry, 14 ALR2d 224.

§ 1-21-102.
Proceedings when title or boundaries to land in question.

If it appears from the
pleadings or the evidence of either party at the trial of any case
in circuit court that the title or boundaries to lands are in question,
the judge shall immediately make an entry thereof in the docket, cease
all further proceedings, and certify to the district court of the
county a transcript of all entries made in the docket relating to
the case in the same manner and within the same time as upon appeal.
The case shall then be conducted in the district court as though appealed
to the district court for trial de novo, except that no bond as on
appeal or payment of costs in the circuit court is required for the
transfer to the district court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 3435; Laws 1895, ch. 16, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4346; C.S. 1910, § 5208; C.S. 1920, § 6484; R.S. 1931, § 62-407; C.S. 1945, § 14-406; W.S. 1957, § 1-534; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-22-102

; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice court” twice, and “judge shall” for “justice shall.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Jurisdiction of district court. —

Where action brought before a justice should have been dismissed for want of jurisdiction and was, on motion of defendants, certified to district court, apparently on supposition that it was governed by this section, whereupon defendants appeared in district court, and successfully resisted plaintiff's motion to remand, court obtained jurisdiction of their persons, which could not be affected by the fact that, before going to trial, they moved to dismiss for want of jurisdiction, and district court had jurisdiction of the action, the subject matter thereof being within its original jurisdiction. Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1892).

Small claims action filed in a circuit court by a homeowners' association to collect allegedly overdue association dues should have been certified to the district court because the case encompassed questions concerning the validity of restrictive covenants that would affect homeowners' title. Granite Springs Retreat Ass'n v. Manning, 2006 WY 60, 133 P.3d 1005,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2006).

Action of forcible entry and unlawful detainer was within jurisdiction of justice's court,

where issue of title was immaterial because landlord and tenant relationship between parties was shown, tenant therefore being estopped to deny landlord's title. Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1930).

Cited

in

Steffens v. Smith, 477 P.2d 119,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 1-21-103.
Payment of costs for witness not examined.

If any witness is subpoenaed,
attends and is not examined by either party, the costs of the witness
shall be paid by the party ordering the subpoena, unless the adverse
party confesses the matter or otherwise renders unnecessary the examination
of the witness.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 30; R.S. 1887, § 3452; R.S. 1899, § 4363; C.S. 1910, § 5225; C.S. 1920, § 6501; R.S. 1931, § 62-604; C.S. 1945, § 14-504; W.S. 1957, § 1-543; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-22-103

.

Cross references. —

As to fees of witnesses, see §

1-14-102

.